Georgia, session 2025_26, HB786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
29 SECTION 1.
30 Short title.
31 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Dodge County Building and Public
32 Facilities Authority Act."
33 SECTION 2.
34 Dodge County Building and Facilities Authority.
35 There is created a public body corporate and politic to be known as the Dodge County
36 Building and Public Facilities Authority which shall be an instrumentality and a public
37 corporation of the State of Georgia, the purpose of which shall be to acquire, construct,
38 equip, maintain, and operate certain projects for use by Dodge County or any other political
39 subdivision or municipality located within Dodge County for its governmental, proprietary,
40 public, and administrative functions. The authority shall not be a state institution, nor a
H. B. 786
- 2 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
41 department or agency of the state, but shall be an instrumentality of the state, a mere creation
42 of the state, being a distinct corporate entity and being exempt from the provisions of Article
43 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50 of the O.C.G.A., the "Georgia State Financing and Investment
44 Commission Act." The authority shall have its principal office in Dodge County, and its
45 legal situs or residence for the purposes of this Act shall be Dodge County.
46 SECTION 3.
47 Membership.
48 The authority shall consist of five members who shall be eligible to succeed themselves and
49 who shall be elected by the Board of Commissioners of Dodge County. No more than two
50 members of the authority may be a member of said board of commissioners. Any member
51 of the authority who is a member of said board of commissioners shall serve for a term of
52 office concurrent with such person's term of office as a member of said board of
53 commissioners. Each member of the authority who is not a member of said board of
54 commissioners shall serve for a term of office of three years, except that the initial terms of
55 office of those members first appointed to the authority shall be specified at the time of
56 appointment to be one, two, and, if no such member is a member of the board of
57 commissioners, three years. After such initial terms, those members who are not members
58 of said board of commissioners shall each serve for terms of office of three years. Members
59 of the authority shall serve for the terms of office so specified and until the appointment and
60 qualification of their respective successors. Vacancies on the authority shall be filled by said
61 board of commissioners for the remainder of the unexpired term and until the appointment
62 and qualification of a successor. Immediately after their election, the members of the
63 authority shall enter upon their duties. The authority shall elect one of its members as
64 chairperson and one as vice chairperson. The secretary-treasurer of the authority shall be
65 appointed by the authority and need not be a member of the authority. Two members of the
H. B. 786
- 3 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
66 authority shall constitute a quorum, and no vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of
67 the quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority and, in every
68 instance, a majority vote of a quorum shall authorize any legal act of the authority, including
69 all things necessary to authorize and issue revenue bonds. The members of the authority
70 shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed by the authority for
71 their actual expenses properly incurred in the performance of their official duties. The
72 authority shall promulgate rules and regulations for its own government and shall have
73 perpetual existence.
74 SECTION 4.
75 Definitions.
76 As used in this Act, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless
77 a different meaning clearly appears from the context:
78 (1) "Authority" shall mean the Dodge County Building and Public Facilities Authority
79 created by this Act.
80 (2) "Board of commissioners" shall mean the Board of Commissioners of Dodge County.
81 (3) "Cost of project" shall include the cost of lands, buildings, improvements, machinery,
82 equipment, property, easements, rights, franchises, material, labor, services acquired or
83 contracted for, plans and specification, financing charges, construction costs, interest
84 prior to and during construction; architectural, accounting, engineering, inspection,
85 administrative, fiscal, and legal expenses; expenses incident to determining the feasibility
86 or practicability of the project; and expenses incident to the acquiring, constructing,
87 equipping, and operating of any project or any part thereof, and to the placing of the same
88 in operation.
89 (4) "Project" shall mean and include real and personal property acquired or held by the
90 authority, including all land, buildings, structures, sanitary and surface water sewers,
H. B. 786
- 4 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
91 utilities, including natural gas distribution, telecommunications, fiber, cable and
92 broadband services; and other public property determined by the authority to be desirable
93 for the efficient operation of any department, board, office, commission, or agency of
94 Dodge County, the Dodge County School District, any municipality or other political
95 subdivisions located within Dodge County, or of the State of Georgia, in the performance
96 of its governmental, proprietary, and administrative functions.
97 (5) "Revenue bonds" shall mean revenue bonds issued under the provisions of Article
98 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A., the "Revenue Bond Law," or under the
99 provisions of this Act. The obligations authorized under this Act may be issued by the
100 authority in the manner authorized under the "Revenue Bond Law."
101 SECTION 5.
102 Powers.
103 The authority shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate
104 the purposes and provisions of this Act including, but without limiting the generality of the
105 foregoing, the power:
106 (1) To sue and be sued;
107 (2) To adopt and alter a corporate seal;
108 (3) To make and execute with public and private persons and corporations contracts,
109 trusts, leases, rental agreements, and other instruments relating to its projects and in
110 furtherance of the purposes of the authority, including contracts for constructing, renting,
111 or leasing of its projects for the use of any county or municipality in this state;
112 (4) To acquire in its own name by purchase on such terms and conditions and in such
113 manner as it may deem proper or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real and personal
114 property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, or rights and easements
115 therein, and to use the same so long as its corporate existence shall continue and to lease
H. B. 786
- 5 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
116 or make contracts with respect to the use of or disposition of the same in any manner it
117 deems to the best advantage of the authority. Title to any such property shall be held by
118 the authority exclusively for the benefit of the public.
119 (5) To improve, extend, add to, reconstruct, renovate, or remodel any project or part
120 thereof already acquired;
121 (6) To pledge or assign any revenues, income, rent, charges, and fees received by the
122 authority;
123 (7) To appoint and select agents, engineers, architects, attorneys, fiscal agents,
124 accountants, and employees and to provide for their compensation and duties;
125 (8) To construct, reconstruct, acquire, own, alter, repair, remodel, maintain, extend,
126 improve, operate, manage, and equip projects located on land owned or leased by the
127 authority;
128 (9) To receive, accept, and use any contributions, loans, or grants by persons, firms, or
129 corporations, including the State of Georgia and the United States of America, or any
130 instrumentality thereof, and any other contributions;
131 (10) To pay all or part of the costs of any project from the proceeds of revenue bonds of
132 the authority or from other lawful sources available to it;
133 (11) To prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of and to exercise police powers
134 over the projects managed or operated by the authority;
135 (12) To accept, receive, and administer gifts, grants, loans and devises of money,
136 material, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the State of Georgia
137 or the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, upon such
138 terms and conditions as the State of Georgia or the United States of America or such
139 agency or instrumentality may impose;
140 (13) To sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage, dispose of, grant in
141 trust, or grant options for any real or personal property or interest therein in furtherance
142 of the purposes of the authority;
H. B. 786
- 6 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
143 (14) As security for repayment of authority obligations, to pledge, mortgage, convey,
144 assign, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber any property, real or personal, of such
145 authority and to execute any trust agreement, indenture, or security agreement containing
146 any provisions not in conflict with law, which trust agreement, indenture, or security
147 agreement may provide for foreclosure or forced sale of any property of the authority
148 upon default, on such obligations, either in payment of principal or interest or in the
149 performance of any term or condition, as are contained in such agreement or indenture;
150 (15) To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue revenue bonds payable
151 solely from funds pledged for that purpose, and to provide for the payment of the same
152 and for the rights of the holders thereof;
153 (16) To exercise all powers usually possessed by private corporations performing similar
154 functions which are not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state; and
155 (17) Pursuant to proper resolution of the authority, to issue revenue bonds payable from
156 the rents and revenues of the authority and its projects, which bonds may be issued in
157 either fully negotiable coupon form, in which event they shall have all the qualities and
158 incidents of negotiable instruments under the laws of this state, or they may be issued in
159 whole or in part in nonnegotiable fully registered form without coupons, payable to a
160 designated payee or to the registered assigns of the payee with such conversion privileges
161 as the authority may provide, for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost
162 associated with the projects authorized by the authority, including the cost of
163 constructing, reconstructing, equipping, extending, adding to, or improving such projects,
164 or for the purpose of refunding, as provided in this Act, any such bonds of the authority
165 theretofore issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount
166 required for the purpose for which such bonds were issued, the surplus shall be paid into
167 the fund provided for the payment of principal and interest on such bonds. All such
168 revenue bonds shall be issued and validated under and in accordance with the provisions
169 of Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A., the "Revenue Bond Law," and in
H. B. 786
- 7 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
170 accordance with all terms and provisions thereof not in conflict with this Act and in
171 accordance with Code Section 50-17-1 of the O.C.G.A., relating to use of facsimile
172 signatures on public securities, and, as security for the payment of any revenue bonds so
173 authorized, any rents and revenue of the authority may be pledged and assigned. Such
174 bonds are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose, and
175 such bonds and all income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State
176 of Georgia. For the purpose of the exemption from taxation of such bonds and the
177 income therefrom, the authority shall be deemed to be a political subdivision of the State
178 of Georgia.
179 SECTION 6.
180 Credit not pledged and debt not created by bonds.
181 Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this Act shall not constitute a debt or a pledge
182 of the faith and credit of the State of Georgia or Dodge County; but such bonds shall be
183 payable from the rentals, revenue, earnings, and funds of the authority as provided in the
184 resolution, trust agreement, or indenture authorizing the issuance and securing the payment
185 of such bonds. The issuance of such bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently
186 obligate the state or said county to levy or pledge any form of taxation whatever for the
187 payment thereof. No holder of any bond or receiver or trustee in connection therewith shall
188 have the right to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state or of said
189 county, nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable,
190 upon any such property. All such bonds shall contain on their face a recital setting forth
191 substantially the foregoing provisions of this section.
H. B. 786
- 8 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
192 SECTION 7.
193 Trust agreement.
194 In the discretion of the authority, any issue of revenue bonds may be secured by an
195 agreement or indenture made by the authority with a corporate trustee, which may be any
196 trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without this state.
197 Such trust agreement or indenture may pledge and assign rents, fees, charges, revenues, and
198 earnings to be received by the authority. The resolution providing for the issuance of
199 revenue bonds and such trust agreements or indenture may contain provisions for protecting
200 and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders, including the right of appointment
201 of a receiver upon default of the payment of any principal or interest obligation and the right
202 of any receiver or trustee to enforce collection of any rents, fees, charges, or revenues for use
203 of the project or projects necessary to pay all costs of operation and all reserves provided for,
204 all principal and interest on all bonds of the issue, all costs of collection, and all other costs
205 reasonably necessary to accomplish the collection of such sums in the event of any default
206 of the authority. Such resolution and such trust agreement or indenture may include
207 covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property for
208 and construction of the project and to the custody, safeguarding, and application of all funds
209 and covenants providing for the operation, maintenance, repair, and insurance of the project
210 or projects and may contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which
211 additional revenue bonds may be issued. Such trust agreement or indenture may set forth the
212 rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right
213 of action of bondholders as is customary in securing bonds and debentures of corporations
214 and may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for
215 the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust may be
216 treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project affected by
217 such trust.
H. B. 786
- 9 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
218 SECTION 8.
219 Refunding bonds.
220 The authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue bonds of the
221 authority for the purpose of calling, refunding, or refinancing any revenue bonds issued
222 under the provisions of this Act and then outstanding and to include in the amount of such
223 refunding bonds all interest and any call premiums that may be required for the redemption
224 and refunding of such outstanding bonds.
225 SECTION 9.
226 Venue of actions, jurisdiction.
227 Any action to protect or enforce any rights under the provisions of this Act or any action
228 against the authority brought in the courts of the State of Georgia shall be brought in the
229 Superior Court of Dodge County, Georgia; and any action pertaining to validation of any
230 bonds issued under the provisions of this Act shall be brought in said court, which shall have
231 exclusive, original jurisdiction of such actions.
232 SECTION 10.
233 Revenue bond validation.
234 The petition for validation of all revenue bonds of the authority shall be brought against the
235 authority, and any contracting party whose obligation is pledged as security for the payment
236 of the bonds sought to be validated, as defendants, and the defendants shall be required to
237 show cause, if any exists, as to why such contract or contracts and the terms and conditions
238 thereof shall not be adjudicated to be in all respects valid and binding upon such contracting
239 parties. It shall be incumbent upon such defendants to defend against adjudication of the
H. B. 786
- 10 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
240 validity and binding effect of such contract or contracts or be forever bound thereby. Notice
241 of such proceedings shall be included in the notice of the validation hearing required to be
242 issued and published by the clerk of the Superior Court of Dodge County in which court such
243 validation proceedings shall be initiated.
244 SECTION 11.
245 Interest of bondholders protected.
246 While any of the bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or
247 existence of the authority or of its officers, employees, or agents shall not be diminished,
248 impaired, or affected in any manner that will affect adversely the interest and rights of the
249 holders of such bonds. The provisions of this section shall be for the benefit of the authority
250 and the holders of any such bonds and, upon the issuance of bonds under the provisions of
251 this Act, shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds.
252 SECTION 12.
253 Revenues, earnings, rents, and charges; use.
254 (a) For the purpose of earning sufficient revenue to make possible the financing of the
255 construction of the project or projects of the authority with revenue bonds, the authority is
256 authorized and empowered to fix, revise, and collect rents, fees, and charges on each project
257 which it shall cause to be acquired or constructed. Such rents, fees, or charges to be paid for
258 the use of such project or projects shall be so fixed and adjusted as to provide a fund
259 sufficient with other revenue, if any, of such project or projects or of the authority:
260 (1) To pay the cost of operating, maintaining, and repairing the project or projects,
261 including reserves for insurance and extraordinary repairs and other reserves required by
H. B. 786
- 11 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
262 the resolution or trust agreement or indenture pertaining to such bonds and the issuance
263 thereof, unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for;
264 (2) To pay the principal of and interest on such revenue bonds as the same shall become
265 due, including call premium, if any, the proceeds of which shall have been or will be used
266 to pay the cost of such project or projects;
267 (3) To comply with any sinking fund requirements contained in the resolution or trust
268 agreement or indenture pertaining to the issuance of and security for such bonds;
269 (4) To perform fully all provisions of such resolution and trust agreement or indenture
270 relating to the issuance of or security for such bonds to the payment of which such rent
271 is pledged;
272 (5) To accumulate any excess income which may be required by the purchasers of such
273 bonds or may be dictated by the requirements of such resolution, trust agreement, or
274 indenture, or of achieving ready marketability of and low interest rates on such bonds;
275 and
276 (6) To pay any expenses in connection with such bond issue or of such project or
277 projects, including but not limited to trustees', attorneys', and fiscal agents' fees.
278 (b) Such rent shall be payable at such intervals as may be agreed upon and set forth in the
279 rental contract or lease providing therefor, and any such contract or lease may provide for the
280 commencement of rent payments to the authority prior to the completion of the undertaking
281 by the authority of any such project and may provide for the payment of rent during such
282 times as such project or projects may be partially or wholly untenantable.
283 (c) Such rental contract or lease may obligate the tenants or lessees to operate, maintain, and
284 keep in good repair, including complete reconstruction, if necessary, the rented or leased
285 premises and projects, regardless of the cause of the necessity of such maintenance, repair,
286 or reconstruction.
287 (d) Such rental contract or lease may obligate the tenants or lessees to indemnify and save
288 harmless the authority from any and all damage to persons and property occurring on or by
H. B. 786
- 12 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
289 reason of the leased property or improvements thereon and to undertake, at the expense of
290 the tenants or lessees, the defense of any action brought against the authority by reason of
291 injury or damages to persons or property occurring on or by reason of the leased premises.
292 (e) In the event of any failure or refusal on the part of the tenants or lessees to perform
293 punctually any covenant or obligation contained in any such rental contract or lease, the
294 authority may enforce performance by any legal or equitable process against the tenants or
295 lessees.
296 (f) The authority shall be permitted to assign any rent payable to it, pursuant to such rental
297 contract or lease, to a trustee or paying agent as may be required by the terms of the
298 resolution or trust agreement or indenture relating to the issuance of and security for such
299 bonds.
300 (g) The use and disposition of the authority's revenue shall be subject to the provisions of
301 the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of the trust agreement or indenture,
302 if any, securing the same.
303 SECTION 13.
304 Sinking fund.
305 The revenue, rents, and earnings derived from any particular project or projects and any and
306 all revenue, rents, and earnings received by the authority, regardless of whether such
307 revenue, rents, and earnings were produced by a particular project for which bonds have been
308 issued, unless otherwise pledged, may be pledged by the authority to payment of the
309 principal of and interest on revenue bonds of the authority as may be provided in any
310 resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in any trust instrument pertaining to such
311 bonds, and such funds so pledged, from whatever source received, may include funds
312 received from one or more or all sources and may be set aside at regular intervals into
H. B. 786
- 13 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
313 sinking funds for which provision may be made in any such resolution or trust instrument
314 and which may be pledged to and charged with the payment of:
315 (1) The interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall become due;
316 (2) The principal of the bonds as the same shall mature;
317 (3) The necessary charges of any trustee or paying agent for paying such principal and
318 interest; and
319 (4) Any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase;
320 and the use and disposition of any sinking fund may be subject to such regulation as may be
321 provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust instrument
322 securing the payment of the same.
323 SECTION 14.
324 Property acquired for public purpose.
325 The exercise of the powers conferred upon the authority under this Act shall constitute an
326 essential governmental function for a public purpose, and the property it acquires shall be
327 deemed to be public property. To the maximum extent permitted by laws of this state, the
328 authority shall not be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired
329 by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the
330 operation and maintenance of property acquired by it or of buildings or other improvements
331 erected or acquired by it or any fees, rents, or other charges for the use of such property or
332 buildings or improvements or other income received by the authority. Nothing provided in
333 this section shall include an exemption from sales and use tax on property purchased by or
334 for the use of the authority.
H. B. 786
- 14 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
335 SECTION 15.
336 Immunity from tort actions.
337 The authority shall have the same immunity and exemption from liability for torts and
338 negligence as the State of Georgia, and the officers, agents, and employees of the authority,
339 when in performance of work of the authority, shall have the same immunity and exemption
340 from liability for torts and negligence as officers, agents, and employees of the State of
341 Georgia. The authority may be sued the same as private corporations on any contractual
342 obligation of the authority.
343 SECTION 16.
344 Property not subject to levy and sale.
345 The property of the authority shall not be subject to levy and sale under legal process.
346 SECTION 17.
347 Trust funds.
348 All funds received pursuant to authority of Section 12 of this Act, whether as proceeds from
349 the sale of revenue bonds or as revenue, rents, fees, charges, or other earnings or as grants,
350 gifts, or other contributions, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied by the
351 authority, solely as provided in this Act. The bondholders entitled to receive the benefits of
352 such funds shall have a lien on all such funds until the same are applied as provided for in
353 any such resolution or trust instrument of the authority.
H. B. 786
- 15 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
354 SECTION 18.
355 Construction.
356 This Act and any other law enacted with reference to the authority shall be liberally
357 construed for the accomplishment of its purposes.
358 SECTION 19.
359 Scope of operations.
360 The projects of the authority's operation shall be located in the territory embraced within the
361 jurisdictional limits of Dodge County as the same now or may hereafter exist.
362 SECTION 20.
363 Conveyance of property upon dissolution.
364 Should the authority for any reason be dissolved after full payment of all bonded
365 indebtedness incurred under this Act, both as to principal and interest, title to all property of
366 any kind and nature, real and personal, held by the authority at the time of such dissolution
367 shall be conveyed to Dodge County. The title to any such property may be conveyed prior
368 to such dissolution in accordance with provisions which may be made therefor in any
369 resolution or trust instrument relating to such property, subject to any liens, leases, or other
370 encumbrances outstanding against or in respect to said property at the time of such
371 conveyance.
H. B. 786
- 16 -

25 LC 47 3567/AP
372 SECTION 21.
373 Effect of partial invalidity of Act.
374 Should any sentence, clause, phrase, or part of this Act be declared for any reason to be
375 unconstitutional or invalid, the same shall not affect such remainder of this Act or any part
376 hereof, other than the part so held to be invalid, but the remaining provisions of this Act shall
377 remain in full force and effect. It is the express intention of this Act to enact each provision
378 of this Act independently of any other provision hereof.
379 SECTION 22.
380 Repealer.
381 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 786
- 17 -